Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-4219
Foster care reimbursement rates; increases; legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature that beginning July 1, 2021, the Division of Children and Family Services of the Department of Health and Human Services shall implement a two-percent increase to foster care reimbursement rates for fiscal year 2021-22 and beginning July 1, 2022, the division shall implement a two-percent increase to foster care reimbursement rates for fiscal year 2022-23.

Laws 2021, LB100, § 3.